Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1161.
do enact as follows:SB1161,11Section 1. 71.05 (6) (b) 59. of the statutes is created to read:SB1161,2,8271.05 (6) (b) 59. a. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026, an 3amount received by an individual as a stipend from a local governmental unit or 4qualified entity that is provided for service during the taxable year as a volunteer 5emergency responder in this state and is based on the number of calls or shifts 6worked, time on call, or a similar metric. The amount of a subtraction under this 7subdivision may not exceed the lesser of $2,000 or the amount of the stipend that is 8included in the individual’s federal adjusted gross income in the taxable year.SB1161,2,119b. In this subdivision, “emergency responder” means an emergency medical 10responder, as defined in s. 256.01 (4p), emergency medical services practitioner, as 11defined in s. 256.01 (5), or a firefighter.SB1161,3,212c. In this subdivision, “qualified entity” means a nonprofit entity with which 1a local governmental unit contracts to provide firefighting or emergency medical 2services.SB1161,23Section 2. 256.15 (4) (g) of the statutes is created to read:SB1161,3,84256.15 (4) (g) If a licensed physician assistant or physician or licensed 5registered nurse is staffing an ambulance or an emergency medical responder 6department, the department may not limit the physician assistant, physician, or 7registered nurse from practicing within the scope of practice permitted by the 8individual license of the physician assistant, physician, or registered nurse.SB1161,39Section 3. 256.15 (4m) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1161,3,1010256.15 (4m) (a) In this subsection, “rural:SB1161,3,13111. “Rural ambulance service provider” means an ambulance service provider 12for which the population of the largest single municipality, as defined in s. 5.02 (11), 13in the ambulance service provider’s service area is less than 10,000.SB1161,414Section 4. 256.15 (4m) (a) 2. of the statutes is created to read:SB1161,3,1815256.15 (4m) (a) 2. “Rural emergency medical responder department” means 16an emergency medical responder department for which the population of the largest 17single municipality, as defined in s. 5.02 (11), in the emergency medical responder 18department’s service area is less than 10,000.SB1161,519Section 5. 256.15 (4m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1161,4,520256.15 (4m) (b) An ambulance operated by a rural ambulance service 21provider that is licensed under sub. (5) or a rural emergency medical responder 22department at any level may upgrade its service level to the highest level of license 23of any member of a responding emergency medical responder department or 24emergency medical services practitioner staffing that the transporting ambulance 1if the medical director approves a proposal submitted to him or her by the rural 2ambulance service provider. If a member of a rural emergency medical responder 3department performs services within the scope of the member’s level of license, but 4above the transporting ambulance service provider’s service level, that member 5shall accompany the patient to the hospital.SB1161,66Section 6. 256.15 (7) of the statutes is renumbered 256.15 (7) (a).SB1161,77Section 7. 256.15 (7) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB1161,4,108256.15 (7) (b) 1. The department may not require an applicant who meets the 9requirements under subd. 2. to do any of the following in order to be eligible to apply 10for a license or certificate:SB1161,4,1411a. Present documentation of a current license or certificate issued by another 12state at or above the level being applied and a completed verification of licensure 13form from every state the individual has ever been licensed or certified as an 14emergency medical responder or emergency medical services practitioner.SB1161,4,1915b. Present a completed verification of education form documenting completion 16of an initial course equivalent to the training required for an initial license or 17certificate under the applicable Wisconsin curriculum, and, if initial training was 18completed prior to the current licensing period, present documentation of 19completion of an approved refresher course.SB1161,4,21202. Subdivision 1. applies to an applicant for a license or certificate in this state 21who meets all of the following requirements:SB1161,4,2322a. Has an out-of-state license as an emergency medical services practitioner 23or out-of-state certificate as an emergency medical responder.SB1161,5,224b. Holds a current national registry of emergency medical technicians 1certification at or above the certification or license levels for which the applicant 2seeks a license or certificate.SB1161,83Section 8. 256.15 (10g) of the statutes is created to read:SB1161,5,94256.15 (10g) Expiration date; expired license or certification; late 5renewal; reinstatement. Licenses and certificates obtained under this section 6expire on June 30 of the year that license renewal under sub. (10) or certificate 7renewal under sub. (8) (cm) is required. If a license or certificate obtained under 8this section expires, the department shall enforce the following renewal and 9reinstatement requirements, as applicable:SB1161,5,1810(a) Late renewal. An individual may renew a license or certificate under this 11section that has been expired 12 months or less by applying to the department for 12license or certificate renewal as specified under applicable administrative rules 13promulgated by the department and submitting the late renewal fee specified by 14the department. Upon the department’s renewal of the applicant’s license or 15certificate, the emergency medical services practitioner or emergency medical 16responder shall be credentialed as required by rules promulgated by the 17department before performing emergency medical care as an emergency medical 18services practitioner or emergency medical responder.SB1161,5,2119(b) Reinstatement of license or certificate. 1. In order to reinstate a lapsed 20license or certificate that has been expired for over 12 months but for which less 21than 3 years has lapsed, an applicant shall do all of the following:SB1161,5,2322a. Apply to the department for reinstatement of licensure or certification in 23the manner specified by rules promulgated by the department.SB1161,6,324b. Complete, at any time during the current or previous applicable license or 1certification period, the relevant refresher course or continuing education required 2by the department for renewal of the applicable emergency services practitioner 3license or emergency medical responder certificate.SB1161,6,54c. Maintain a current national registry of emergency medical technicians 5certification.SB1161,6,66d. Submit the reinstatement fee specified by the department.SB1161,6,972. In order to reinstate a license or certificate that has been expired for at 8least 3 years, but for which less than 6 years has lapsed, an applicant shall do all of 9the following:SB1161,6,1210a. Apply to the department for reinstatement of licensure or certification in 11the same manner specified by rules promulgated by the department for 12reinstatement under subd. 1. a.SB1161,6,1613b. Complete, during the current license or certificate period, 2 times the 14required hours of the relevant refresher course or continuing education required by 15the department for renewal of the applicable emergency services practitioner 16license or emergency medical responder certificate.SB1161,6,1817b. Maintain a current national registry of emergency medical technicians 18certification.SB1161,6,22193. A license or certificate that has been expired for 6 years or more may be 20reinstated only if the applicant has successfully completed the training and 21examination requirements for the initial license or certificate within the 24 months 22immediately preceding submission of the application for reinstatement.SB1161,7,2234. Upon reinstatement of licensure or certification by the department under 24subds. 1. to 3., the emergency medical services practitioner or emergency medical 1responder shall be credentialed as required by rules promulgated by the 2department before performing emergency medical care.SB1161,93Section 9. Initial applicability.SB1161,7,64(1) The treatment of ss. 256.15 (7) and (10g) first applies to an application for 5a license or certificate or renewal or reinstatement of a license or certificate filed on 6the effective date of this subsection.SB1161,107Section 10. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 8publication, except as follows:SB1161,7,119(1) The treatment of ss. 256.15 (4) (g), (4m) (a) and (b), (7), and (10g) and 10Section 9 (1) of this act takes effect on the first day of the 3rd month beginning 11after publication. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb1161 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb1161 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1161 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1161 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB1161: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting